Florida, session 2026, HB477.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 893.145, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
893.145 "Drug paraphernalia" defined.—The term "drug
paraphernalia" means all equipment, products, and materials of
any kind which are used, intended for use, or designed for use
in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting,
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing,
preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing,
containing, concealing, transporting, injecting, ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter or s. 877.111.
Drug paraphernalia is deemed to be contraband which shall be
subject to civil forfeiture. The term includes, but is not
limited to:
(4) Testing equipment used, intended for use, or designed
for use in identifying, or in analyzing the strength,
effectiveness, or purity of, controlled substances, excluding
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb477 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 477 2026 Legislature
narcotic-drug-testing products that are used solely to determine
whether a controlled substance contains fentanyl as described in
s. 893.03(2)(b)9., dangerous fentanyl or fentanyl analogues as
or any other controlled substance specified in s.
893.135(1)(c)4.a., or xylazine as described in s.
893.03(1)(c)37. This exclusion does not apply to a narcotic-
drug-testing product that can measure or determine the quantity,
weight, or potency of a controlled substance.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb477 -01-er